Nebraska, session 109, LB92.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB92 LB92
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 6 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Residential Tenant Clean Slate Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Residential Tenant Clean Slate Act:
(1) Clean slate relief means the sealing of records under section 5
of this act;
(2) Eviction proceeding means an action for:
(a) Forcible entry and detainer involving a residential tenancy
under sections 25-21,219 to 25-21,235; or
(b) Possession of any premises subject to the Uniform Residential
Landlord and Tenant Act or the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act;
(3) Landlord includes a landlord as defined in section 76-1410 and a
landlord as defined in section 76-1462;
(4) Residential tenancy means a tenancy, however created, between a
landlord and a tenant for a dwelling unit;
(5) Tenant means a current or former occupant of a dwelling unit
pursuant to a residential tenancy;
(6) Trial court means the trial court that presided over an eviction
proceeding; and
(7) When reference in this section is made to a definition found in
both the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act and the Mobile Home
Landlord and Tenant Act, the definition relevant to the type of tenant at
issue applies for purposes of the Residential Tenant Clean Slate Act.
Sec. 3. If a trial court issues an order dismissing an eviction
proceeding against a tenant, the trial court shall immediately issue an
order under section 5 of this act granting clean slate relief to such
tenant.
Sec. 4. (1) A tenant may petition the trial court for clean slate
relief for an eviction proceeding at any time if:
(a) The proceeding meets the requirements for clean slate relief
under section 3 of this act, but the record remains public;
(b) Following the eviction proceeding, a judgment granting the writ
-2-

LB92 LB92
2025 2025
of restitution against the tenant is reversed or vacated;
(c) Following the eviction proceeding, a writ of restitution is
never executed;
(d) The tenant was evicted for nonpayment during the state of
emergency related to the COVID-19 pandemic between March 13, 2020, and
June 30, 2021;
(e) A named defendant in the eviction proceeding was a minor child;
or
(f) The judgment granting a writ of restitution against the tenant
occurred in violation of subsection (5) of section 76-1431.
(2) If subsection (1) of this section does not apply, a tenant may
petition the trial court for clean slate relief for an eviction
proceeding when three years have passed since issuance of a writ of
restitution or since final judgment was otherwise entered against the
tenant in such proceeding.
(3)(a) A petition under this section shall be filed in the trial
court. Notice shall be served upon all other persons who were parties to
the eviction proceeding. Within thirty days after receipt of notice, any
such party may file objections to the petition.
(b) If no objection is timely filed, the trial court shall grant the
petition without further hearing if the requirements of this section have
been met.
(c) If an objection is filed, a hearing shall be held and the
objecting party shall have the burden of establishing why clean slate
relief should not be granted.
(4) Upon granting a petition under this section, the court shall
issue an order for clean slate relief under section 5 of this act.
(5) An order granting or denying a petition under this section is a
final, appealable order for purposes of section 25-1902.
(6) This section applies to all eviction proceedings, without regard
to the date of filing or conclusion of the eviction proceeding, including
-3-

LB92 LB92
2025 2025
those occurring prior to the operative date of this act.
Sec. 5. (1) In issuing an order for clean slate relief, the court
shall:
(a) Order that all records relating to the eviction proceeding are
not part of the public record and shall not be disseminated; and
(b) If the case was transferred from one court to another, send
notice of the order to seal the record to the transferring court.
(2) Following entry of a court order granting clean slate relief, a
court shall:
(a) Respond to a public inquiry in the manner as if there had not
been an eviction proceeding involving the tenant; and
(b) Not disseminate any information regarding such eviction
proceeding.
(3)(a) A tenant shall not be questioned with respect to any eviction
proceeding for which the record is sealed under this section:
(i) In any application for housing, a lease, employment, bonding,
licensure, or education;
(ii) With respect to an application or request for any other right
or privilege;
(iii) In any appearance as a witness; or
(iv) In any other public inquiry.
(b) If an inquiry is made in violation of this subsection, the
tenant may respond as if the eviction proceeding never occurred.
(4) In any application for housing, a landlord shall not consider a
tenant's prior eviction if clean slate relief has been granted for such
eviction.
Sec. 6. The State Court Administrator may adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the Residential Tenant
Clean Slate Act.
Sec. 7. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
-4-